Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.010

Examination of premises.

(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, shall have authority at all times of day and night, in the performance of duties imposed by this chapter, to enter upon and examine any building or premises where any fire has occurred and other buildings and premises adjoining or near thereto.

(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, shall have authority at any reasonable hour to enter into any public building or premises or any building or premises used for public purposes to inspect for fire hazards.

[ 1995 c 369 s 25; 1986 c 266 s 67; 1985 c 470 s 17; 1947 c 79 s .33.03; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 45.33.03. Formerly RCW 48.48.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—1985 c 470: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 470 s 38.]

Effective date—1985 c 470: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1986." [ 1985 c 470 s 40.]